Idaho, session 2026, H0772.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-1705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-1705. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, TRANSPORTATION, AND RESEARCH OF IN-
DUSTRIAL HEMP AUTHORIZED. (1) Production, processing, transportation, and
research of industrial hemp are subject to the rules promulgated under this
chapter, the state plan, and the 2018 farm bill and the rules promulgated
thereunder.
(2) The director must expeditiously promulgate rules that are compli-
ant with the 2018 farm bill in time to allow for the production, processing,
transportation, and research of industrial hemp in Idaho under the state
plan beginning with the spring 2022 growing season of industrial hemp. Any
rule formulated and recommended by the Idaho state department of agricul-
ture regarding the production, processing, transportation, or research of
industrial hemp that is broader in scope or more stringent than federal law
or regulations as outlined in the 2018 farm bill or that proposes to regu-
late an activity not regulated by the federal government is subject to the
following additional requirements: the notice of proposed rulemaking and
rulemaking record requirements under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, must
clearly specify that the proposed rule, or portions of the proposed rule,
are broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations or
regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government and delineate
which portions of the proposed rule are broader in scope or more stringent
than federal law or regulations or regulate an activity not regulated by the
federal government.
(3) Once a state plan is accepted by the secretary of agriculture, the
production, processing, transportation, and research of industrial hemp in
Idaho will also be subject to the state plan.
(4) The department is authorized to promulgate rules establishing fees
and penalties for violations associated with the provisions of this chapter.
(5) No penalty may be imposed against a person unless the person was
given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administra-
tive procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. A person against whom
the department has assessed a penalty under this chapter or the rules pro-
mulgated pursuant to this chapter may, within thirty (30) days of the final
agency action making the assessment, appeal the assessment to the district
court of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter:


(a) Rules promulgated under this chapter must be adopted through the
negotiated rulemaking process; and
(b) The transportation of industrial hemp in interstate commerce may
continue subject to the provisions of section 67-2921, Idaho Code.
(7) Hemp producers do not commit a negligent violation if:
(a) The hemp is produced for the sole purpose of producing grain or
fiber;
(b) The hemp producer has made reasonable efforts to grow hemp within
the acceptable hemp THC level, as defined by rule, and in accordance
with Idaho statutes, rules, and the state hemp plan; and
(c) The hemp does not have a total THC, as defined by rule, concentra-
tion of more than one percent (1%) on a dry weight basis.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.